Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.265

Dissolution.

A limited liability company is dissolved and its affairs must be wound up upon the first to occur of the following:

(1) The dissolution date, if any, specified in the certificate of formation. If a dissolution date is specified in the certificate of formation, the certificate of formation may be amended and the date of dissolution of the limited liability company may be extended by vote of all the members;

(2) The happening of events specified in a limited liability company agreement;

(3) The written consent of all members;

(4) Ninety days following an event of dissociation of the last remaining member, unless those having the rights of transferees in the limited liability company under RCW 25.15.131(1) have, by the ninetieth day, voted to admit one or more members, voting as though they were members, and in the manner set forth in RCW 25.15.121(1);

(5) The entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under RCW 25.15.274; or

(6) The administrative dissolution of the limited liability company by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.610, unless the limited liability company is reinstated by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.615.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7113; 2015 c 188 s 51.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.